algorithms/slovak.sbl
routines (
  R2
  lower_case
  un_accent
  exception
  mark_p1
  mark_p2  
  prefixes
  suffixes
  end_vowel
)

externals ( stem )
integers ( p1 p2 )
groupings ( vowel )

stringescapes {}

stringdef A"   '{U+00C1}'    // dlhe a
stringdef A:   '{U+00C4}'    // siroke a
stringdef C<   '{U+010C}'   // c s makcenom
stringdef D<   '{U+010E}'   // d s makcenom
stringdef E"   '{U+00C9}'    // e s dlznom
stringdef E<   '{U+011A}'   // e s makcenom
stringdef I"   '{U+00CD}'    // i s dlznom
stringdef L"   '{U+0139}'   // l s dlznom
stringdef L<   '{U+013E}'   // l s makcenom
stringdef N<   '{U+013D}'   // n s makcenom
stringdef O>   '{U+00D4}'    // o s vokanom
stringdef O"   '{U+00D3}'    // o s dlznom
stringdef R"   '{U+0154}'   // r s dlznom
stringdef R<   '{U+0158}'   // r s makcenom
stringdef S<   '{U+0160}'   // s s makcenom
stringdef T<   '{U+0164}'   // t s makcenom
stringdef U"   '{U+00DA}'    // u s dlznom
stringdef U^   '{U+016E}'   // u s kruzkom
stringdef Y"   '{U+00DD}'    // y s dlznom
stringdef Z<   '{U+017D}'   // z s makcenom

stringdef a"   '{U+00E1}'    // dlhe a
stringdef a:   '{U+00E4}'    // siroke a
stringdef c<   '{U+010D}'   // c s makcenom
stringdef d<   '{U+010F}'   // d s makcenom
stringdef e"   '{U+00E9}'    // e s dlznom
stringdef e<   '{U+011B}'   // e s makcenom
stringdef i"   '{U+00ED}'    // i s dlznom
stringdef l"   '{U+013A}'   // l s dlznom
stringdef l<   '{U+013E}'   // l s makcenom
stringdef n<   '{U+0148}'   // n s makcenom
stringdef o>   '{U+00F4}'    // o s vokanom
stringdef o"   '{U+00F3}'    // o s dlznom
stringdef r"   '{U+0155}'   // r s dlznom
stringdef r<   '{U+0159}'   // r s makcenom
stringdef s<   '{U+0161}'   // s s makcenom
stringdef t<   '{U+0165}'   // t s makcenom
stringdef u"   '{U+00FA}'    // u s dlznom
stringdef u^   '{U+016F}'   // u s kruzkom
stringdef y"   '{U+00FD}'    // y s dlznom
stringdef z<   '{U+017E}'   // z s makcenom
stringdef ia   'ia'        // ia
stringdef ie   'ie'        // ie
stringdef iu   'iu'        // iu

define vowel 'aeiyou'

define un_accent as repeat (
	[substring] among (
		'{a"}' (<-'a')
		'{a:}' (<-'a')
		'{c<}' (<-'c')
		'{d<}' (<-'d')
		'{e"}' (<-'e')
		'{e<}' (<-'e')
		'{i"}' (<-'i')
		'{l"}' (<-'l')
		'{l<}' (<-'l')
		'{n<}' (<-'n')
		'{o>}' (<-'o')
		'{o"}' (<-'o')
		'{r"}' (<-'r')
		'{r<}' (<-'r')
		'{s<}' (<-'s')
		'{t<}' (<-'t')
		'{u"}' (<-'u')
		'{u^}' (<-'u')
		'{y"}' (<-'y')
		'{z<}' (<-'z')
		'' (next)
	)
)

define lower_case as repeat (
	[substring] among (
		'{A"}' (<-'{a"}')
		'{A:}' (<-'{a:}')
		'{C<}' (<-'{c<}')
		'{D<}' (<-'{d<}')
		'{E"}' (<-'{e"}')
		'{E<}' (<-'{e<}')
		'{I"}' (<-'{i"}')
		'{L"}' (<-'{l"}')
		'{L<}' (<-'{l<}')
		'{N<}' (<-'{n<}')
		'{O>}' (<-'{o>}')
		'{O"}' (<-'{o"}')
		'{R"}' (<-'{r"}')
		'{R<}' (<-'{r<}')
		'{S<}' (<-'{s<}')
		'{T<}' (<-'{t<}')
		'{U"}' (<-'{u"}')
		'{U^}' (<-'{u^}')
		'{Y"}' (<-'{y"}')
		'{Z<}' (<-'{z<}')
		'' (next)
	)
)

define exception as (
    [substring] atlimit among (
        /* specialne */
        'som' 'si' 'je'
		'sme' 'ste' 'su'
		'bol' 'bola' 'bolo'
		'bud' 'budte' 'budme' 'budu'
		'budem' 'budes' 'bude' 'budeme' 'budete'
        (<-'byt')

        'mam' 'mas' 'ma' 'mame' 'mate' 'maju'
		'mal' 'mala' 'malo' 'mali'
		'maj' 'majme' 'majte'
        (<-'mat')

        'idem' 'ides' 'ide' 'ideme' 'idete' 'idu'
		'isiel' 'siel' 'isla' 'sla' 'islo' 'slo' 'isli' 'sli'
		'chod' 'chodte' 'pod' 'podme' 'podte'
		'pojdem' 'pojdes' 'pojde' 'pojdeme' 'pojdete' 'pojdu'		
        'iduc' 'iduca' 'iduce' 'iduci'
        (<-'ist')

        'jem' 'jes' 'jedia' 'jeme' 'jete'
		'jedol' 'jedla' 'jedlo' 'jedli'
        'jedz' 'jedzte' 'jedzme'
        (<-'jest')

		'babiek' 'babicka'
		(<- 'babk')

		'dlan'
		(<- 'dlan')

		'matka' 'maticka' 'mamka' 'mamicka'
		(<- 'mam')

		'majetok'
		(<- 'majetk')

		'meste' 'miest'
		(<- 'mest')

		'sral' 'srali'
		(<- 'ser')

		'zien'
		(<- 'zen')
    )
)

define mark_p1 as (
    $p1 = limit
	gopast vowel gopast non-vowel setmark p1
)

define prefixes as (
	do (
		[substring] among (
			'proti'
			(
				$p1 > 4 delete
			)
			'bez' 'cez' 'naj' 'nad' 'pod' 'pre' 'pri' 'roz'
			(
				$p1 > 2 delete
			)
			'do' 'od' 'ob' 'po' 'ne' 'vy' 'vz' 'za'
			(
				$p1 > 1 delete
			)
		)
	)
)

backwardmode (

    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

	define mark_p2 as (
		$p2 = limit
	)

    define suffixes as (
		do mark_p2
        do (
            [substring] R2 among (
				'ejsieho' 'ejsiemu'
				'ejsich' 'ejsimi' 'inovia' 'encoch' 'encami'
				'ejsom' 'ejsim' 'ejsia' 'ejsie' 'ejsej' 'eniec'
				'ejsiu' 'ejsou' 'inych' 'inymi' 'ovych' 'ovymi'
				'inami' 'inovi' 'inoch' 'atami' 'atach' 'encom'
				'avame' 'avate' 'avaju' 'ovala' 'ovalo' 'ovali'
				'ujeme' 'ujete'
				'ejsi' 'iemu' 'ieho' 'inmu' 'inho' 'inej' 'ence'
				'inou' 'inov' 'inom' 'inym' 'ovia' 'iach' 'atom'
				'ovho' 'ovej' 'ovou' 'ovym' 'ovmu' 'ovom' 'atam'
				'ieme' 'iete' 'avam' 'avas' 'oval' 'ujem' 'ujes'
				'ujme' 'ujte' 'ujuc'
				'ovi' 'ovy' 'och' 'ami' 'ach' 'iam'	'eho' 'ete'
				'ych' 'ich' 'ymi' 'imi' 'ini' 'ata' 'atu' 'uju'
				'ina' 'inu' 'ino' 'ine' 'sie' 'emu' 'ati' 'uje'
				'ime' 'ite' 'ila' 'ilo' 'ili' 'iem' 'ies'
				'ali' 'ala' 'alo' 'ame' 'ate' 'aju' 'eme'
				'ove' 'ovu' 'ovo' 'jte' 'jme' 'ska'
				'ym' 'im' 'ia' 'ie' 'ej' 'iu' 'om' 'ou'
				'ho' 'mu' 'ov' 'mi' 'am' 'in' 'at' 'is' 'il'
				'va' 'vu' 've' 'vo' 'al' 'es' 'it' 'as' 'te'
				'me'
				'v' 'n' 'a' 'm' 'i'	'u' 'e'  'y'
                (delete)
            )
        )
    )

    define end_vowel as (
        [vowel] (delete)
    )	
)

define stem as (
  do lower_case
  do un_accent
  do mark_p1
  do prefixes
  exception or backwards (
	  do suffixes
	  do end_vowel
  )
)
